Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 14, article 9, section 9, is amended to read: Sec. 9. CITY OF MOUNTAIN LAKE; TIF DISTRICT NO. 1-8; FIVE-YEAR RULE EXTENSION. (a) The requirement of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 3, that activities must be undertaken within a five-year period from the date of certification of a tax increment financing district, is extended by a deleted text begin five-yeardeleted text end new text begin three-yearnew text end periodnew text begin to April 1, 2029,new text end for Tax Increment Financing District No. 1-8, administered by the city of Mountain Lake or its economic development authority. (b) The requirement of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 4, relating to the use of increment after the expiration of the five-year period under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 3, is extended to the deleted text begin 11thdeleted text end new text begin 14thnew text end year for Tax Increment Financing District No. 1-8. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Mountain Lake and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end